Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8134.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-18 of the General Laws entitled "Accident and Sickness Insurance
Policies" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-18-96. Coverage of emergency medical services mental health and substance use
disorder treatment.
(a) As used in this section, "emergency medical services" or "EMS" means the
practitioners, ambulance vehicles, and ambulance service entities licensed in accordance with
chapter 4.1 of title 23 to provide emergency medical care, transportation, and preventive care to
mitigate loss of life or exacerbation of illness or injury, including, but not limited to, EMS
responding to the 911 system established under chapter 21.1 of title 39.
(b) Emergency medical services shall be permitted to allow licensed providers who
evaluate and treat mental health disorders, including substance use disorders, to accompany EMS.
Such providers shall be permitted to evaluate and treat EMS patients when medically necessary
and appropriate. Such evaluation and treatment shall be permitted to occur in the community.
(c) Emergency medical services shall be permitted to transport to the following facilities
designated by the director of the department of health:
(1) Emergency room diversion facilities, as defined in § 23-17.26-2; and
(2) Community-based behavioral health facilities designed to provide immediate assistance
to a person in crisis.
(d) Commencing January 1, 2027, every individual or group health insurance contract, plan

or policy issued for delivery or renewed in this state that provides medical coverage that includes
coverage for emergency medical services, shall provide coverage for evaluation and treatment
described in subsection (b) of this section and shall reimburse such services at a rate not lower than
the same service would have been had that service been delivered in a traditional office setting.
(e) Commencing January 1, 2027, every individual or group health insurance contract, plan
or policy issued for delivery or renewed in this state that provides medical coverage that includes
coverage for emergency medical services, shall provide coverage for transportation and described
in subsection (c) of this section and shall reimburse such services at a rate not lower than the same
rate as for transport to an emergency department.
(f) Treatment and coverage for mental health disorders, including substance use disorders,
as described in this section shall be provided in accordance with chapter 38.2 of title 27.
(g) The department of health with the collaboration of the ambulance service coordinating
advisory board shall promulgate any rules, regulations, standing orders, protocols, and procedures
necessary and proper for the efficient administration and enforcement of this section.
(h) The office of the health insurance commissioner may promulgate such rules and
regulations as are necessary and proper to effectuate the purpose and for the efficient administration
and enforcement of this section.
SECTION 2. Chapter 27-19 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Hospital Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-19-88. Coverage of emergency medical services mental health and substance use
disorder treatment.
(a) As used in this section, "emergency medical services" or "EMS" means the
practitioners, ambulance vehicles, and ambulance service entities licensed in accordance with
chapter 4.1 of title 23 to provide emergency medical care, transportation, and preventive care to
mitigate loss of life or exacerbation of illness or injury, including, but not limited to, EMS
responding to the 911 system established under chapter 21.1 of title 39.
(b) Emergency medical services shall be permitted to allow licensed providers who
evaluate and treat mental health disorders, including substance use disorders, to accompany EMS.
Such providers shall be permitted to evaluate and treat EMS patients when medically necessary
and appropriate. Such evaluation and treatment shall be permitted to occur in the community.
(c) Emergency medical services shall be permitted to transport to the following facilities
designated by the director of the department of health:
(1) Emergency room diversion facilities, as defined in § 23-17.26-2; and
(2) Community-based behavioral health facilities designed to provide immediate assistance
LC005024 - Page 2 of 7

to a person in crisis.
(d) Commencing January 1, 2027, every individual or group health insurance contract, plan
or policy issued for delivery or renewed in this state that provides medical coverage that includes
coverage for emergency medical services, shall provide coverage for evaluation and treatment
described in subsection (b) of this section and shall reimburse such services at a rate not lower than
the same service would have been had that service been delivered in a traditional office setting.
(e) Commencing January 1, 2027, every individual or group health insurance contract, plan
or policy issued for delivery or renewed in this state that provides medical coverage that includes
coverage for emergency medical services, shall provide coverage for transportation and described
in subsection (c) of this section and shall reimburse such services at a rate not lower than the same
rate as for transport to an emergency department.
(f) Treatment and coverage for mental health disorders, including substance use disorders,
as described in this section shall be provided in accordance with chapter 38.2 of title 27.
(g) The department of health with the collaboration of the ambulance service coordinating
advisory board shall promulgate any rules, regulations, standing orders, protocols, and procedures
necessary and proper for the efficient administration and enforcement of this section.
(h) The office of the health insurance commissioner may promulgate such rules and
regulations as are necessary and proper to effectuate the purpose and for the efficient administration
and enforcement of this section.
SECTION 3. Chapter 27-20 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Medical Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-20-84. Coverage of emergency medical services mental health and substance use
disorder treatment.
(a) As used in this section, "emergency medical services" or "EMS" means the
practitioners, ambulance vehicles, and ambulance service entities licensed in accordance with
chapter 4.1 of title 23 to provide emergency medical care, transportation, and preventive care to
mitigate loss of life or exacerbation of illness or injury, including, but not limited to, EMS
responding to the 911 system established under chapter 21.1 of title 39.
(b) Emergency medical services shall be permitted to allow licensed providers who
evaluate and treat mental health disorders, including substance use disorders, to accompany EMS.
Such providers shall be permitted to evaluate and treat EMS patients when medically necessary
and appropriate. Such evaluation and treatment shall be permitted to occur in the community.
(c) Emergency medical services shall be permitted to transport to the following facilities
designated by the director of the department of health:
LC005024 - Page 3 of 7

(1) Emergency room diversion facilities, as defined in § 23-17.26-2; and
(2) Community-based behavioral health facilities designed to provide immediate assistance
to a person in crisis.
(d) Commencing January 1, 2027, every individual or group health insurance contract, plan
or policy issued for delivery or renewed in this state that provides medical coverage that includes
coverage for emergency medical services, shall provide coverage for evaluation and treatment
described in subsection (b) of this section and shall reimburse such services at a rate not lower than
the same service would have been had that service been delivered in a traditional office setting.
(e) Commencing January 1, 2027, every individual or group health insurance contract, plan
or policy issued for delivery or renewed in this state that provides medical coverage that includes
coverage for emergency medical services, shall provide coverage for transportation and described
in subsection (c) of this section and shall reimburse such services at a rate not lower than the same
rate as for transport to an emergency department.
(f) Treatment and coverage for mental health disorders, including substance use disorders,
as described in this section shall be provided in accordance with chapter 38.2 of title 27.
(g) The department of health with the collaboration of the ambulance service coordinating
advisory board shall promulgate any rules, regulations, standing orders, protocols, and procedures
necessary and proper for the efficient administration and enforcement of this section.
(h) The office of the health insurance commissioner may promulgate such rules and
regulations as are necessary and proper to effectuate the purpose and for the efficient administration
and enforcement of this section.
SECTION 4. Chapter 27-41 of the General Laws entitled "Health Maintenance
Organizations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-41-101. Coverage of emergency medical services mental health and substance use
disorder treatment.
(a) As used in this section, "emergency medical services" or "EMS" means the
practitioners, ambulance vehicles, and ambulance service entities licensed in accordance with
chapter 4.1 of title 23 to provide emergency medical care, transportation, and preventive care to
mitigate loss of life or exacerbation of illness or injury, including, but not limited to, EMS
responding to the 911 system established under chapter 21.1 of title 39.
(b) Emergency medical services shall be permitted to allow licensed providers who
evaluate and treat mental health disorders, including substance use disorders, to accompany EMS.
Such providers shall be permitted to evaluate and treat EMS patients when medically necessary
and appropriate. Such evaluation and treatment shall be permitted to occur in the community.
LC005024 - Page 4 of 7

(c) Emergency medical services shall be permitted to transport to the following facilities
designated by the director of the department of health:
(1) Emergency room diversion facilities, as defined in § 23-17.26-2; and
(2) Community-based behavioral health facilities designed to provide immediate assistance
to a person in crisis.
(d) Commencing January 1, 2027, every individual or group health insurance contract, plan
or policy issued for delivery or renewed in this state that provides medical coverage that includes
coverage for emergency medical services, shall provide coverage for evaluation and treatment
described in subsection (b) of this section and shall reimburse such services at a rate not lower than
the same service would have been had that service been delivered in a traditional office setting.
(e) Commencing January 1, 2027, every individual or group health insurance contract, plan
or policy issued for delivery or renewed in this state that provides medical coverage that includes
coverage for emergency medical services, shall provide coverage for transportation and described
in subsection (c) of this section and shall reimburse such services at a rate not lower than the same
rate as for transport to an emergency department.
(f) Treatment and coverage for mental health disorders, including substance use disorders,
as described in this section shall be provided in accordance with chapter 38.2 of title 27.
(g) The department of health with the collaboration of the ambulance service coordinating
advisory board shall promulgate any rules, regulations, standing orders, protocols, and procedures
necessary and proper for the efficient administration and enforcement of this section.
(h) The office of the health insurance commissioner may promulgate such rules and
regulations as are necessary and proper to effectuate the purpose and for the efficient administration
and enforcement of this section.
SECTION 5. Chapter 42-7.2 of the General Laws entitled "Office of Health and Human
Services" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-7.2-21. Coverage for emergency medical services mental health and substance use
disorder.
(a) As used in this section, "emergency medical services" or "EMS" means the
practitioners, ambulance vehicles, and ambulance service entities licensed in accordance with
chapter 4.1 of title 23 to provide emergency medical care, transportation, and preventive care to
mitigate loss of life or exacerbation of illness or injury, including, but not limited to, EMS
responding to the 911 system established under chapter 21.1 of title 39.
(b) Emergency medical services shall be permitted to allow licensed providers who
evaluate and treat mental health disorders, including substance use disorders, to accompany EMS.
LC005024 - Page 5 of 7

Such providers shall be permitted to evaluate and treat EMS patients when medically necessary
and appropriate. Such evaluation and treatment shall be permitted to occur in the community.
(c) Emergency medical services shall be permitted to transport to the following facilities
designated by the director of the department of health:
(1) Emergency room diversion facilities, as defined in § 23-17.26-2; and
(2) Community-based behavioral health facilities designed to provide immediate assistance
to a person in crisis.
(d) Rhode Island Medicaid and its contracted managed care entities shall provide coverage
for transportation, evaluation, and treatment described in subsections (c) and (d) of this section and
shall reimburse such services at a rate not lower than the same service would have been had that
service been delivered in a traditional office setting or for transport to an emergency department.
(e) The executive office of health and human services shall set the reimbursement rates for
the services described in this section.
SECTION 6. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005024
========
LC005024 - Page 6 of 7